Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 201.071, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Form. Both paper and electronic voter registration applications must contain the same information unless otherwise provided by law. A voter registration application must contain spaces for the following required information: voter's first name, middle name, and last name; voter's previous name, if any; voter's current address; voter's previous address, if any; voter's date of birth; voter's municipality and county of residence; voter's telephone number, if provided by the voter; date of registration; current and valid Minnesota driver's license number or Minnesota state identification number, or if the voter has no current and valid Minnesota driver's license or Minnesota state identification, the last four digits of the voter's Social Security number; and voter's signature. The paper registration application must provide a space for a voter to provide a physical description of the location of their residence, if the voter resides in an area lacking a specific physical address. The description must be sufficient for the county auditor to identify the correct precinct for the voter. The description may include the closest cross street or the nearest address to the described location that is identified on a precinct map, and directions from that cross street or address to the described location, including but not limited to the cardinal direction and approximate distance to the location. The paper registration application may include the voter's email address, if provided by the voter. The electronic voter registration application must include the voter's email address. The registration application may include the voter's interest in serving as an election judge, if indicated by the voter. The application must also contain the following certification of voter eligibility: "I certify that I: (1) am at least 16 years old and understand that I must be at least 18 years old to be eligible to vote; (2) am a citizen of the United States; (3) will have maintained residence in Minnesota for 20 days immediately preceding election day; (4) maintain residence at the address or location given on the registration form; (5) am not under court-ordered guardianship in which the court order revokes my right to vote; (6) have not been found by a court to be legally incompetent to vote; (7) am not currently incarcerated for a conviction of a felony offense; and (8) have read and understand the following statement: that giving false information is a felony punishable by not more than five years imprisonment or a fine of not more than $10,000, or both." The certification must include boxes for the voter to respond to the following questions: "(1) Are you a citizen of the United States?" and "(2) Are you at least 16 years old and will you be at least 18 years old on or before the day of the election in which you intend to vote?" And the instruction: "If you checked 'no' to either of these questions, do not complete this form." The form of the voter registration application and the certification of voter eligibility must be as provided in this subdivision and new text begin must additionally include any requirements of federal law including, if applicable, a requirement that the voter provide documentation of the voter's citizenship. The final form must be new text end approved by the secretary of state. Voter registration forms authorized by the National Voter Registration Act must also be accepted as valid. The federal postcard application form must also be accepted as valid if it is not deficient and the voter is eligible to register in Minnesota. An individual may use a voter registration application to apply to register to vote in Minnesota or to update information on an existing registration. Sec. 2. new text begin COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS IN ELECTIONS.new text end new text begin The secretary of state is directed to ensure that all state and local elections officials comply with applicable federal requirements related to the conduct of elections in the state, including any new federal requirements that may be enacted on or after the effective date of this section. No later than January 15, 2027, and annually thereafter, the secretary of state must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over elections certifying that the secretary has met the requirements under this section with respect to any federal laws in effect as of the date of the report. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin FEDERAL COMPLIANCE GRANTS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the secretary of state for the purpose of providing grants to counties to assist them in complying with federal requirements related to the conduct of elections. This is a onetime appropriation. The secretary of state must establish a process to distribute this appropriation among each county that submits a request, allocated in inverse proportion to each county's voter turnout at the 2024 state general election. A county must segregate the money into a federal compliance account. Allocated money may only be used by a county for the purpose of complying with any new federal requirements related to the conduct of elections for federal offices that are enacted on or after the effective date of this section. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective the day following final enactment. new text end